Washington statutes.
RCW 3.74.900

Transfer of proceedings—1961 c 299.

All cases, proceedings and matters pending before justice courts, police courts, municipal courts and night courts shall be transferred to the appropriate court established by chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW, together with all files, records and proceedings relating to such cases. Chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW shall not affect any appeal from any municipal court, police court, justice court or night court, but such appeal shall be conducted and concluded as if chapters 3.30 through 3.74 RCW had not been enacted, except that if remanded from the superior court the superseding court shall have the authority and power to forfeit bail or bond or impose sentence thereon.

[ 1961 c 299 s 127.]